ln_CD/ln_CD.aff
# Hunspell affix file for Lingala
# Copyright 2009 Kevin P. Scannell
# This file is distributed under the same license as hunspell-ln 
SET UTF-8
TRY ankmolbáiístyɔóǵeɛépzdwuúNMBALKEOTfrâSIYvôZhPÉcÓÍÁCWÚUGFêƐVRîDǐûƆxǒqjJHÂǔǍ
WORDCHARS ‘’-
CIRCUMFIX X
NEEDAFFIX Z

REP 2
REP o ɔ
REP e ɛ

#  Note no pronouns mo, li, mi, ... for noun classes 3+ - easy enough to add
# pronoun prefixes for verbs
PFX P Y 8
PFX P 0	na/X	.
PFX P 0	o/X	.
PFX P 0	a/X	.
PFX P 0	e/X	.
PFX P 0	to/X	.
PFX P 0	bo/X	.
PFX P 0	ba/X	.
PFX P 0	i/X	.

# high tone pronoun prefixes, for the subjunctive
PFX H Y 8
PFX H 0	ná/X	.
PFX H 0	ó/X	.
PFX H 0	á/X	.
PFX H 0	é/X	.
PFX H 0	tó/X	.
PFX H 0	bó/X	.
PFX H 0	bá/X	.
PFX H 0	í/X	.

# future prefix: combination of pronoun and -ko-
PFX F Y 8
PFX F 0	nako/X	.
PFX F 0	oko/X	.
PFX F 0	ako/X	.
PFX F 0	eko/X	.
PFX F 0	toko/X	.
PFX F 0	boko/X	.
PFX F 0	bako/X	.
PFX F 0	iko/X	.

# ko- prefix for infinitives
PFX K Y 1
PFX K 0	ko/X	.

# bo-, to- prefix for imperatives
PFX B Y 2
PFX B 0	bo/X	.
PFX B 0	to/X	.

# plurals 1->2, 5->6, 7->8, 11->6, 14->6 (bo->ma)
PFX I Y 10
PFX I mo ba mo
PFX I mɔ ba mɔ
PFX I li ma li
PFX I lí mí lí
PFX I e bi e
PFX I ɛ bi ɛ
PFX I lo ma lo
PFX I lɔ ma lɔ
PFX I bo ma bo
PFX I bɔ ma bɔ

# plurals "1a"->2, 9->2, etc. add ba
PFX M Y 1
PFX M 0 ba .

# class 3 plurals in class 4
PFX J Y 2
PFX J mo mi mo
PFX J mɔ mi mɔ

# nasal plurals in class 10
# note no rule for n-, mp-, etc. words - they are left alone
PFX L Y 10
PFX L mo n mo
PFX L mɔ n mɔ
PFX L lo n lo[^bilmnpy]
PFX L lo m lo[bp]
PFX L lo mp loi
PFX L lol nd lol
PFX L lom m lom
PFX L lon n lon
PFX L loy nz loy
PFX L lɔ n lɔ

# no present continuatif for now - same as future but caron on pronoun 
# so just copy F to a new prefix and use that
SFX V Y 63
SFX V 0 a/PX	.	+FUTURIMMEDIAT
SFX V 0 ɛ/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURIMMEDIAT
SFX V 0 ɛ/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURIMMEDIAT
SFX V 0 ɛ/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURIMMEDIAT
SFX V 0 ɔ/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURIMMEDIAT
SFX V 0 ɔ/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURIMMEDIAT
SFX V 0 ɔ/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURIMMEDIAT
SFX V 0 aka/PX	.	+HABITUAL1
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL1
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL1
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL1
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL1
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL1
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL1
SFX V 0 aka/FX	.	+HABITUAL2
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/FX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL2
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/FX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL2
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/FX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL2
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/FX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL2
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/FX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL2
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/FX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+HABITUAL2
SFX V 0 a/HX	.	+SUBJUNCTIVE
SFX V 0 ɛ/HX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIVE
SFX V 0 ɛ/HX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIVE
SFX V 0 ɛ/HX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIVE
SFX V 0 ɔ/HX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIVE
SFX V 0 ɔ/HX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIVE
SFX V 0 ɔ/HX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIVE
SFX V 0 aka/HX	.	+SUBJUNCTIFHABITUEL
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/HX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIFHABITUEL
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/HX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIFHABITUEL
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/HX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIFHABITUEL
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/HX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIFHABITUEL
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/HX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIFHABITUEL
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/HX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+SUBJUNCTIFHABITUEL
SFX V 0 a/KX	.	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɛ/KX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɛ/KX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɛ/KX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɔ/KX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɔ/KX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɔ/KX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 aka/KX	.	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/KX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/KX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɛkɛ/KX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/KX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/KX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 ɔkɔ/KX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+INFINITIVE
SFX V 0 a/FX	.	+FUTURELOIGNE
SFX V 0 ɛ/FX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURELOIGNE
SFX V 0 ɛ/FX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURELOIGNE
SFX V 0 ɛ/FX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURELOIGNE
SFX V 0 ɔ/FX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURELOIGNE
SFX V 0 ɔ/FX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURELOIGNE
SFX V 0 ɔ/FX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+FUTURELOIGNE
SFX V 0 áni/BX		.	+IMPERATIVE
SFX V 0 ɛ́ni/BX		[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX V 0 ɛ́ni/BX		[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX V 0 ɛ́ni/BX		[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX V 0 ɔ́ni/BX		[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX V 0 ɔ́ni/BX		[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX V 0 ɔ́ni/BX		[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
