ln_CD/ln_CD.dic
band/ZVW
biang/ZVW
bilingan/ZV
bin/ZVW
bom/ZVW
bulam/ZV
bulungan/ZV
bund/ZVW
butw/ZVW
bwɛt/ZVW
bákisel/ZV
bális/ZV
bánzabanz/ZV
bátisam/ZV
béelel/ZV
bélel/ZV
béngam/ZV
bétol/ZV
bíkis/ZV
bómbam/ZV
bótam/ZV
búb/ZVW
búmel/ZV
bɔkɔl/ZV
bɔ́ndɛl/ZV
bɔ́ngisel/ZV
bɛ́t/ZVW
défis/ZV
fukamis/ZV
fumbuk/ZV
fungw/ZVW
fándis/ZV
fúndam/ZV
gbom/ZVW
kab/ZVW
kabolam/ZV
kalambis/ZV
kamatan/ZV
kamwis/ZV
kangan/ZV
kangol/ZV
kanisel/ZV
kil/ZVW
kit/ZVW
kob/ZVW
kokisam/ZV
komam/ZV
kotol/ZV
kukol/ZV
kundam/ZV
kwel/ZVW
kwélanis/ZV
kákis/ZV
kámol/ZV
káokis/ZV
kátel/ZV
kékam/ZV
kíb/ZVW
kímis/ZV
kóm/ZVW
kúfel/ZV
kúsam/ZV
kɔ́ngɔl/ZV
kɛsɛn/ZV
lakan/ZV
landaland/ZV
lel/ZVW
limbolam/ZV
lob/ZVW
longolam/ZV
lumbut/ZV
lángol/ZV
léisan/ZV
lían/ZVW
lóngan/ZV
lɛmb/ZVW
mek/ZVW
mát/ZVW
míbimis/ZV
míbíkis/ZV
míkok/ZVW
míkúmis/ZV
mílobel/ZV
míngáng/ZVW
mísálel/ZV
mítánd/ZVW
mítún/ZVW
míyókis/ZV
mɔ́nisel/ZV
nan/ZVW
netol/ZV
ninganis/ZV
nyat/ZVW
nyɛt/ZVW
nɔkɔl/ZV
palanganis/ZV
papol/ZV
pel/ZVW
pikisam/ZV
pot/ZVW
pás/ZVW
pítan/ZV
pɔnam/ZV
pɛ́samɛl/ZV
sakol/ZV
sanzol/ZV
sepelis/ZV
sis/ZVW
sukum/ZV
sáb/ZVW
sálelam/ZV
sámbis/ZV
sékw/ZVW
sómb/ZVW
sɔsɔl/ZV
sɛm/ZVW
sɛ́nzɛl/ZV
tetem/ZV
tub/ZVW
tál/ZVW
támbwis/ZV
télengan/ZV
tíkal/ZV
tíyam/ZV
tóndan/ZV
túk/ZVW
túny/ZVW
tɔmbɔk/ZV
tɛ́lɛm/ZV
vand/ZVW
wútam/ZV
yom/ZVW
yángelam/ZV
yémb/ZVW
yíndis/ZV
yókol/ZV
zalel/ZV
zimbis/ZV
zokis/ZV
zík/ZVW
zóngel/ZV
ím/ZVW
ɔng/ZVW
mobálani/I
mobámbi-mbata/I
mobandémí/I
mobanzi/I
mobeki/I
mobengami/I
mobeti/I
mobinisi/I
mobɔndi/I
mobólí/I
mobomeli/I
mobotami/I
mobɔtwɔmi/I
mobútéli/I
mofándelí/I
moíbi/I
mokangemi/I
mokitani/I
mokómeli/I
mokulami/I
molakami/I
molekami/I
molimi/I
molóni/I
momemi/I
mongali/I
monyangelami/I
mopekisi/I
mopusi/I
mosemba/I
mosombi/I
motámbolisi/I
motɔngi/I
motungisami/I
moyebami/I
mozángi/I
libándá/I
libáteli/I
libéngami/I
libɔlɔ/I
liboko/I
libóti/I
libúngá/I
lidendi/I
likabwani/I
likangami/I
likatani/I
likibisi/I
likɛmbi/I
likomí/I
likuba/I
likuta/I
lilebu/I
liloba/I
limbolongo/I
limpola/I
lingátu/I
lingunzani/I
linyuta/I
lipapú/I
lipika/I
lipusi/I
lisangeli/I
lisékwa/I
lisɛki/I
lisulu/I
litali/I
litatela/I
litíti/I
litope/I
litungi/I
liyébi/I
liziba/I
ebalabala/I
ebambwela/I
ebángabanga/I
ebatimiseli/I
ebélélá/I
ebengá/I
ebetélé/I
ebimeli/I
ebɛlɛmɛla/I
ebóléla/I
ebóngá/I
ebótisa/I
ebuka/I
ebundeli/I
ebwɛlɛ/I
efandela/I
efúndafunda/I
ekabweli/I
ekamela/I
ekange/I
ekáteli/I
ekelé/I
ekindo/I
ekɔndela/I
ekololeli/I
ekongóngó/I
ektarɛ/I
ekúmbákumba/I
elabo/I
elámbo/I
elelalela/I
eleto/I
elimbwisela/I
elɛlɛku/I
eloneli/I
elúkélá/I
ematisi/I
emelamela/I
emoneli/I
enateli/I
engekete/I
engunzola/I
entsuntsu/I
epakata/I
epaté/I
epinya/I
epɔtɛli/I
esálisela/I
esasela/I
esésé/I
esiningi/I
esoli/I
esɔsɔ/I
etaka/I
etámbwiseli/I
etɔbɔli/I
etíma/I
etɛndi/I
etɔtɔkɔ/I
etumbeli/I
ewewe/I
eyébela/I
eyikela/I
eyonga/I
ezengeli/I
ezo/I
lokolo/I
bobelu/I
bokumbe/I
bosuko/I
tatá/M
papá/M
mamá/M
kaná/M
lɛki/M
nɔ́kɔ́/M
sángó/M
yayá/M
kɔ́kɔ/M
kulútu/M
ndeko/M
anzelú/M
sodá/M
zúzi/M
kapíta/M
sɛnzɛ́li/M
kaláki/M
pulúsi/M
bɔ́i/M
bokiló/M
bɔlɔkɔ/M
bua/M
búku/M
butiki/M
falánga/M
fimbo/M
kalási/M
kani/M
katini/M
katolikɛ/M
kazáka/M
kelási/M
kɛlɛlɔ/M
kiló/M
kilograme/M
kilomɛtrɛ/M
kíti/M
kombekombe/M
kɔpɔ/M
kúku/M
lángi/M
magazini/M
makáko/M
masini/M
mbóka/M
mbula/M
mbuma/M
mbwá/M
mbáta/M
mésa/M
miziki/M
mɔ̌tɔ/M
mpaka/M
ndáko/M
ndɛkɛ/M
ndúmba/M
ngandó/M
ngomba/M
ngɔ́mbɛ́/M
ngúlu/M
ngúma/M
nguna/M
nkósi/M
nsɔmi/M
ntaba/M
ntómá/M
nyama/M
nzéla/M
nzémbo/M
nzeneneke/M
nzeté/M
palátra/M
sandúku/M
sáni/M
sántu/M
vélo/M
zábolo/M
zámba/M
zándo/M
zélo/M
zóba/M
zólo/M
mobáli/J
mobebako/J
mobelo/J
mobendano/J
mobila/J
mobɛlɛ/J
moboku/J
mobombe/J
mobɔtɔ/J
mobungu/J
mofuku/J
mokabá/J
mokakatano/J
mokalángá/J
mokálo/J
mokambila/J
mokángá/J
mokáno/J
mokeka/J
mokende/J
mokenza/J
moketi/J
mokila-mbémbé/J
mokitano/J
mokɔlɔ/J
mokɔndɔ/J
mokɔnyi/J
mokóbo/J
mokola/J
mokómbósó/J
mokongá/J
mokoto-yombo/J
mokula/J
mokúndú/J
mokwa/J
moláká/J
molandano/J
molangó/J
mole/J
moleli/J
molembila/J
molengo/J
moliki/J
molímó/J
mólinga/J
molɛkɛ/J
molɛmbɛ-lɛmbi/J
mololi/J
molombo/J
molúka/J
molumbu/J
molunza/J
mombanga/J
mombete/J
mombito/J
momboli/J
mombonda/J
mombuku/J
momiaka/J
mompalo/J
mompendé/J
mompɛkɛ/J
mompɛ́tɛ́/J
momɛsɛnɔ/J
monana/J
mondende/J
mondika/J
mondɔndi/J
mondóndó/J
mongaí/J
mongangú/J
mongelé/J
mongenza/J
mongili/J
móngóló/J
mongonda/J
mongónza/J
mongunga/J
mongwa/J
monkakale/J
monkámá/J
monkei/J
monkese/J
monkɔlɛ/J
monkoka/J
monkolo/J
monkongo/J
monkunyu/J
monsányá/J
monsekeleke/J
monsila/J
monsɔmbi/J
monsoli/J
monsɔpɔ́/J
montálá/J
montili/J
montobe/J
montonga/J
montulu/J
monyámá/J
monyɛngu/J
monyuku/J
monzembe/J
monzika/J
monzóí/J
moómbé/J
mopanzí/J
mopiato/J
mopɛkɛsɛ/J
mopopa/J
mopumba/J
mosaka/J
mosámbo/J
mosango/J
mosasa/J
mosélékété/J
mosembá/J
moseseke/J
mosíká/J
mosilabende/J
mosingwá/J
mosɔkɔ/J
mosɛmɛ/J
mosɔngɛlɛ/J
mosokó/J
mosɔpi/J
mosumane/J
moswa/J
motalango/J
motángo/J
motele/J
motengu/J
motíndo/J
motɔkɔ/J
motɛndɛ/J
motoka/J
motomba/J
motópi/J
motsetsele/J
motuka/J
motumu/J
mowalo/J
mozanga/J
mozɛlɔ/J
lobabu/L
lobambe/L
lobángá/L
lobángo/L
lobásí/L
lobɛbu/L
lobɛ́kɛ/L
lobela/L
lobele/L
lobelela/L
lobesa/L
lobɛsi/L
lobɛ́tɛ/L
lobila/L
lobimbi/L
loboku/L
loinya/L
lokaka/L
lokala/L
lokángá/L
lokangola/L
lokanisako/L
lokánza/L
lokanzu/L
lokásá/L
lokɛkɛlɛ/L
lokɛndɔ/L
lokenga/L
lokieka/L
lokíkí/L
lokindo/L
lokita/L
lokito/L
lokoma/L
lokonga/L
lokóngia/L
lokɔngi/L
lokóngo/L
lokóni/L
lokosa/L
lokótá/L
lokúmu/L
lokundu/L
lokwá/L
lolaka/L
lolému/L
loléngé/L
lombalo/L
lombange/L
lombɛkɛ/L
lombomboli/L
lombota/L
lombóto/L
lombuma/L
lombwi/L
lomeko/L
lompekese/L
lompɛ́tɛ́/L
lompóso/L
lompumbu/L
londelenge/L
londendenge/L
londongo/L
longɛlɛ/L
longɛmbɔ́/L
longombe/L
longungutu/L
lonsálá/L
lonsankando/L
lonsau/L
lonsundi/L
lonzembe/L
lonzimba/L
lonzoko/L
lonzóngóngó/L
lopakatoi/L
lopambo/L
lopanda/L
lopanzi/L
lopɛpɛi/L
lopɛsɛ/L
lopɛ́tɛ́/L
lopitálo/L
lopose/L
lopɔsi/L
lopóso/L
lopulu/L
lopupusa/L
loputu/L
losáko/L
losálá/L
losámbo/L
losankando/L
losasala/L
losɛlɛlɛ/L
losɛndɛ/L
losili/L
losondo/L
losundi/L
loswe/L
lotɛi/L
loteleme/L
lotómo/L
lotɔtɔ/L
lotsundi/L
lotúkú/L
loyémbo/L
mpúnda/L
mbɛli/L
